Illinois, session 104th, HB694.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Military Veterans Assistance Act is amended 5by changing Section 0.01 as follows: 6    (330 ILCS 45/0.01)  (from Ch. 23, par. 3080)7    Sec. 0.01. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Military Veterans Assistance Act.9(Source: P.A. 86-1324; 87-796.)